District of Columbia statutes.
3-509

Repealed

Denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses; grounds; reinstatement.

Repealed.

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-171, § 10, 29 DCR 5297
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 401(a), 61 DCR 1184
Section 401(b) of D.C. Law 20-96 provided that rules promulgated pursuant to Chapter 5 of this title shall remain in effect until the Mayor promulgates rules to implement this subchapter.